en: Saddle tree width: Adjustable; Draft/XX-Wide; Extra Wide; Medium; Medium Narrow; Medium Wide; Narrow; Wide; Other
ro-RO: Lățime a scheletului șeii: Ajustabilă; Tracțiune/XX-lată; Extra lată; Medie; Medie îngustă; Medie lată; Îngustă; Lat; Altele
pt-PT: Largura da armação do selim: Ajustável; Tração/extra extra largo; Extra largo; Médio; Médio estreito; Médio largo; Estreito; Largo; Outro
sv: Sadelstommens bredd: Justerbar; Kallblod/XX-vid; Extra vid; Medium; Medium/smal; Medium/vid; Smal; Bred; Övrigt
zh-CN: 鞍芯宽度: 可调节; 挽马/特宽; 加宽; 中号; 中等偏窄; 中等偏宽; 窄; 宽; 其他
th: ความกว้างของโครงอาน: ปรับได้; ดราฟท์/กว้างพิเศษมาก; กว้างพิเศษ; กลาง; แคบปานกลาง; กว้างปานกลาง; แคบ; กว้าง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Ширина на основата на седлото: Регулируема; За тежковоз / Много широка; Изключително широка; Средна; Средно тясна; Средно широка; Тясна; Широк; Друго
da: Sadelboms bredde: Justerbar; Koldblod/XX-bred; Ekstra bred; Medium; Medium smal; Medium bred; Smal; Bred; Andet
zh-TW: 鞍架寬度: 可調式; 馱馬 / 特寬 (XX-Wide); 加寬; 中; 中窄; 中寬; 窄; 寬; 其他
it: Larghezza del telaio della sella: Regolabile; Da tiro/XX-largo; Extra largo; Medio; Medio stretto; Medio largo; Stretto; Largo; Altro
lt-LT: Balno karkaso plotis: Reguliuojamas; Sunkiųjų arklių / ypač platus; Ypač platus; Vidutinis; Vidutiniškai siauras; Vidutiniškai platus; Siauras; Platus; Kita
ko: 안장틀 너비: 조절 가능; 드래프트/XX-와이드; 엑스트라 와이드; 미디엄; 미디엄 내로우; 미디엄 와이드; 내로우; 넓음; 기타
sl-SI: Širina ogrodja sedla: Prilagodljivo; Draft/XX-široko; Zelo široko; Srednje; Srednje ozko; Srednje široko; Ozko; Široka; Drugo
nb: Bomvidde på salen: Justerbar; Trekkhest / XX-vid; Ekstra vid; Medium; Medium smal; Medium vid; Smal; Bred; Annet
vi: Chiều rộng khung yên ngựa: Có thể điều chỉnh; Ngựa cày/Cực rộng; Rất rộng; Trung bình; Trung bình hẹp; Trung bình rộng; Hẹp; Rộng; Khác
tr: Sele ağacı genişliği: Ayarlanabilir; Ağır Yük/XX-Geniş; Ekstra geniş; Orta; Orta dar; Orta geniş; Dar; Geniş; Diğer
pt-BR: Sela largura da armação: Ajustável; Draft/extra extra largo; Extra largo; Médio; Médio estreito; Médio largo; Estreito; Largo; Outros
fi: Satulan rungon leveys: Säädettävä; Draft / erittäin leveä (XXW); Erikoisleveä; Medium; Keskikapea; Keskileveä; Kapea; Leveä; Muu
hr-HR: Širina sedla: Podesivo; Draft / XX-široko; Iznimno široko; Srednje; Srednje usko; Srednje široko; Usko; Širok; Ostalo
ru: Ширина ленчика седла: Регулируемая; Для тяжеловозов / очень широкая (XX-Wide); Очень широкая; Средняя; Средне-узкая; Средне-широкая; Узкая; Широкий; Другая
pl: Szerokość terlicy siodła: Regulowana; Dla koni zimnokrwistych/XX-Wide; Bardzo szeroka; Średnia; Średnio-wąska; Średnio-szeroka; Wąska; Szeroki; Inna
fr: Largeur de l’arçon: Ajustable; Trait / Très très large (XXW); Très large; Moyenne; Moyenne étroite; Moyenne large; Étroite; Large; Autre
hu: Nyeregfa szélessége: Állítható; Hidegvérű/XX-széles; Extra széles; Közepes; Közepesen keskeny; Közepesen széles; Keskeny; Széles; Egyéb
el: Πλάτος σκελετού σέλας: Ρυθμιζόμενο; [, ]; Πολύ φαρδύ (Extra Wide); Μεσαίο; Μεσαίο-στενό; Μεσαίο-φαρδύ; Στενό; Φαρδύ; Άλλο
ja: サドルツリーの幅: 調整可能; ドラフト / XX ワイド; エクストラワイド; ミディアム; ミディアムナロー; ミディアムワイド; ナロー; ワイド; その他
sk-SK: Šírka sedlovej kostry: Nastaviteľné; Chladnokrvník/XX-široké; Extra široké; Stredné; Stredne úzke; Stredne široké; Úzke; Široký; Iné
cs: Šířka sedlového stromu: Nastavitelné; Chladnokrevník / XX-Wide; Extra široké; Střední; Středně úzké; Středně široké; Úzké; Široká; Jiné
nl: Zadelboom breedte: Verstelbaar; Trekpaard/XX-breed; Extra breed; Medium; Medium-smal; Medium-breed; Smal; Breed; Overige
es: Ancho del armazón de la montura: Ajustable; Tiro/extra extra ancha; Extra ancha; Media; Media estrecha; Media ancha; Estrecha; Ancho; Otra
de: Breite des Sattelbaums: Verstellbar; Kaltblut/XX-Weit; Extra weit; Mittel; Mittel-Schmal; Mittel-Weit; Schmal; Weit; Sonstige